Louisiana, session 2026, HB457.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IV of Chapter 3 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 40:581, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IV. SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS
§581. Housing and services for individuals experiencing homelessness
A.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health, in consultation with the office of
state fire marshal, shall promulgate rules to establish minimum housing standards for
homeless facilities such as emergency shelters, community facilities, unlicensed
group homes, and halfway houses that receive state or local money to provide
housing or shelter to individuals experiencing homelessness for use by local and
parish governing authorities for permitting or approval purposes.
(2) The minimum housing standards shall consider critical aspects such as
safety, sanitation, privacy, and habitability.
(3) A rule promulgated in accordance with this Section shall not conflict
with federal law requirements for an entity described in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 457 ENROLLED
B. The state fire marshal may assist in the implementation of the provisions
of this Section by conducting annual inspections of emergency shelters, community
facilities, group homes, and halfway houses to verify that the housing options
available to individuals experiencing homelessness are safe and sanitary.
C. The Louisiana Department of Health shall examine the feasibility of
submitting waivers to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to obtain
funding to provide healthcare and housing services to individuals who are
experiencing homelessness.
D. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Homelessness" means the condition of an individual who lacks a fixed,
regular, and adequate nighttime residence and who is primarily living or sleeping in
a place not ordinarily used for human habitation, including public streets, sidewalks,
parks, vehicles, abandoned buildings, encampments, or other outdoor locations.
(2)(a) "Homeless facility" means any building or structure that is established,
operated, maintained, or used for the primary purpose of providing overnight
lodging, sleeping accommodations, temporary habitation, or residential services to
persons experiencing homelessness, including emergency shelters, community
facilities, group homes, and halfway houses that provide housing or shelter to
individuals experiencing homelessness.
(b) "Homeless facility" shall not mean any of the following:
(i) A private residence, including but not limited to a sober living house that
is not operated as a homeless facility.
(ii) A church or other place of worship that is operated exclusively for
charitable purposes and does not charge residents a fee, rent, or require any other
compensation to be paid by the homeless individual for occupancy and which exists
solely to provide free emergency or transitional housing.
(iii) A charitable substance abuse recovery program that is a nonprofit,
faith-based, or charitable residential program operated exclusively for the purpose
of providing counseling, rehabilitation, recovery support, vocational assistance,
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 457 ENROLLED
life-skills training, or supervised residential services to individuals recovering from
substance abuse, addiction, alcoholism, or related behavioral health conditions.
(iv) A facility that is used temporarily to house persons who are displaced
by a hurricane or other gubernatorial declared emergency.
(v) A work-release facility, community reentry center, transitional work
program, or other correctional or rehabilitative facility operated by, under contract
with, or authorized by the state, a political subdivision, or a court for the purpose of
housing or supervising individuals participating in a work release, workforce reentry,
probation, parole, or similar criminal justice program.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.